Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Chapter 38. Head Start.

Cross references. —

For temporary “Parents as Teachers” program in effect 2012 — 2015, see sec. 10, ch. 19, SLA 2012, in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 14.38.010.
Operation of Head Start programs.

The Department of Education and Early Development shall operate the head start funding program governed by 42 U.S.C. 9835.

History.

(§ 8 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Secs. 14.38.100 — 14.38.199.
Day Care Assistance and Child Care Grants. [Repealed, E.O. No. 108, § 88 (2003). For current law, see AS 47.25.001 — 47.25.095.]